Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB161.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286 IS ESTABLISHED,
AND A NEW SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this subtitle, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Applicant" means a person filing an application for a license;
(2) "Consumer" means an individual who resides in this state;
(3) "Control" means the power to direct the management or policies of a licensee or
applicant, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise;
(4) "Earned but unpaid income" means salary, wages, compensation, or other
income that a consumer or an employer has represented, and that an earned
wage access services provider has reasonably determined, has:
(a) Been earned or accrued to the benefit of the consumer in exchange for the
consumer's provision of services to, and on behalf of, the employer,
including:
1. Services provided on an hourly basis, project-based basis, piecework
basis, or other basis; and
2. Circumstances in which the consumer is acting as an independent
contractor of the employer; and
(b) Not been paid to the consumer by the employer at the time of the payment of
proceeds;
(5) (a) "Earned wage access services" means consumer-directed wage access
services, employer-integrated wage access services, or both.
(b) As used in this subsection:
1. "Consumer-directed wage access services" means the delivery to a
consumer of access to earned but unpaid income that is based on the
consumer's representations, and the earned wage access services
Page 1 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
provider's reasonable determination, of the consumer's earned but
unpaid income; and
2. "Employer-integrated wage access services" means the delivery to a
consumer of access to earned but unpaid income that is based on
employment, income, or attendance data, or any combination thereof,
obtained directly from an employer or an employer's payroll service
provider;
(6) "Earned wage access services provider" or "provider":
(a) Means a person that is in the business of offering or providing earned wage
access services to consumers; and
(b) Does not include:
1. A service provider, including a payroll service provider, that:
a. Verifies available earnings; and
b. Is not contractually obligated to fund any proceeds delivered as
part of earned wage access services; or
2. An employer that offers a portion of salary, wages, compensation, or
other income directly to its employees or independent contractors
before the normally scheduled pay date;
(7) "Employer":
(a) Means:
1. A person who employs a consumer; or
2. Any other person who is contractually obligated to pay a consumer
earned but unpaid income in exchange for the consumer's provision
of services to, or on behalf of, the employer, including:
a. Services provided on an hourly basis, project-based basis,
piecework basis, or other basis; and
b. Circumstances in which the consumer is acting as an
Page 2 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
independent contractor of the employer; and
(b) Does not include:
1. A customer of a person referenced in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
or
2. Any other person whose obligation to make a payment of salary,
wages, compensation, or other income to a consumer is not based on
the provision of services by that consumer for, or on behalf of, the
person;
(8) "License" means an earned wage access services provider license issued under
Section 3 of this Act;
(9) "Licensee" means a person licensed as an earned wage access services provider
under this subtitle;
(10) "Managing principal" means a natural person who:
(a) Meets the applicable requirements of Section 7 of this Act; and
(b) Actively participates in, and is primarily responsible for, the operations of a
licensee;
(11) "Material fact" means a fact that a reasonable person knows, or should know,
could reasonably be expected to influence any decision or action taken by the
commissioner under this subtitle;
(12) "Outstanding proceeds" means proceeds remitted to a consumer by an earned
wage access services provider that have not yet been repaid to the provider;
(13) (a) "Person in control of a licensee or applicant" means, with respect to an
applicant or licensee, any of the following:
1. A director, general partner, or executive officer;
2. In the case of a limited liability company, a:
a. Managing member; or
b. Manager;
Page 3 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
3. Any person that directly or indirectly has the right to vote twenty-five
percent (25%) or more of a class of voting securities;
4. Any person that has the power to sell, or direct the sale of, twenty-five
percent (25%) or more of a class of voting securities; or
5. In the case of a partnership or limited liability company, any person
that has the right to receive twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the
capital upon dissolution.
(b) As used in this subsection, "executive officer" means a natural person
holding the title or responsibility of president, vice president, chief executive
officer, chief financial officer, chief operational officer, or chief compliance
officer; and
(14) "Proceeds" means a payment to a consumer by an earned wage access services
provider that is based on earned but unpaid income.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
This subtitle shall not apply to any person doing business under and as permitted by
any law of this state or the United States relating to:
(1) Banks;
(2) Savings banks;
(3) Trust companies;
(4) Savings and loan associations;
(5) Agricultural cooperative associations;
(6) Credit unions;
(7) Licensed pawn brokers; or
(8) Consumer loan companies.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 4 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
(1) A natural person shall not engage in the business of offering or providing earned
wage access services.
(2) A person other than a natural person shall not engage in the business of offering
or providing earned wage access services without first obtaining an earned wage
access services provider license from the commissioner.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "registry" means the State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or
its successor organization.
(2) When an application, report, or approval request is required under this subtitle to
be filed with the commissioner, the commissioner may require, by administrative
regulation or order, that the filing, including any applicable fees and any
supporting documentation, be submitted to:
(a) The registry;
(b) The registry's parent, affiliate, or operating subsidiary; or
(c) Other agencies or authorities as part of a nationwide licensing system,
which may act as an agent for receiving, requesting, and distributing
information to and from any source directed by the commissioner.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of this subtitle to the contrary, the commissioner
may report violations of this subtitle, enforcement actions, and other relevant
information to the registry.
(4) The commissioner may use the registry as an agent for requesting information
from and distributing information to:
(a) The United States Department of Justice; or
(b) Other governmental agencies.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 5 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
Each application for a license shall:
(1) Be made:
(a) In writing;
(b) Under oath or affirmation; and
(c) In a form the commissioner prescribes; and
(2) Contain the following information:
(a) In the case of an applicant that is a partnership, limited liability company,
or association:
1. The names, email addresses, and physical addresses of the:
a. Members; and
b. Managing principals; and
2. A statement that the business will be conducted:
a. At one (1) or more physical addresses, which address or
addresses shall be listed;
b. Entirely online; or
c. Both online and at one (1) or more physical addresses, which
address or addresses shall be listed;
(b) In the case of an applicant that is a corporation:
1. The names, email addresses, and physical addresses of the:
a. Principal officers;
b. Directors; and
c. Managing principals; and
2. A statement that the business will be conducted:
a. At one (1) or more physical addresses, which address or
addresses shall be listed;
b. Entirely online; or
c. Both online and at one (1) or more physical addresses, which
Page 6 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
address or addresses shall be listed; and
(c) Any additional information that the commissioner prescribes.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Each applicant, at the time of making an application for a license, shall pay the
following to the commissioner:
(1) Five hundred dollars ($500) as a fee for investigating the application; and
(2) The additional sum of five hundred dollars ($500) as an annual license fee for
the period terminating on the last day of the current calendar year.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) To qualify for a license, an applicant shall deposit, and maintain for the
duration of licensure under this subtitle, with the commissioner, in a form
directed by the commissioner, one (1) of the following instruments that
satisfy the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection:
1. An irrevocable letter of credit;
2. A corporate surety bond;
3. Evidence, which shall include a signed and notarized
acknowledgement from the financial institution, that the applicant
has:
a. Established an account payable to the commissioner in a
federally insured financial institution in this state; and
b. Deposited United States currency in the account referenced in
subdivision a. of this subparagraph in an amount that satisfies
the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
4. A savings certificate of a federally insured financial institution in this
state that is not available for withdrawal except by direct order of the
Page 7 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
commissioner, with a signed and notarized acknowledgement from the
financial institution. Interest earned on the certificate shall accrue to
the applicant.
(b) The instruments identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:
1. Be made payable to the commissioner;
2. Be in the following amounts:
a. If the applicant is privately held, one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000); or
b. If the applicant is publicly traded, two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000);
3. Provide for claim on the instrument by the commissioner who has a
cause of action under this subtitle. The total liability of the surety,
cumulative or otherwise, shall not exceed the amount specified in the
instrument; and
4. Be available for:
a. The recovery of expenses, fines, and fees levied or imposed by
the commissioner under this subtitle; and
b. Losses or damages that are determined by the commissioner to
have been incurred by any customer as a result of the applicant's
or licensee's failure to comply with the requirements of this
subtitle.
(c) A claim shall not be maintained to enforce any liability on an instrument
under this subsection unless the claim is brought within three (3) years after
the act upon which it is based.
(2) For any application, including renewal applications, an applicant or licensee
shall demonstrate that its financial condition is sufficient to effectively conduct
the business of a licensee in Kentucky by having and maintaining, for the
Page 8 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
duration of licensure under this subtitle:
(a) If the applicant is privately held, a total net worth of at least one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000); or
(b) If the applicant is publicly traded, a total net worth in excess of two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
(3) (a) Each applicant shall have, at the time of making an application and for the
duration of licensure under this subtitle, at least one (1) managing
principal.
(b) Each licensee shall notify the department within thirty (30) days following a
change in any of its managing principals.
(4) (a) At the time of application and following any change in a managing
principal, the commissioner shall require each managing principal and
person in control of an applicant or licensee to submit to a criminal
background check.
(b) The cost of each criminal background check shall be borne by the applicant
or licensee.
(5) (a) The commissioner may deem an application incomplete if the applicant fails
to pay any fee, or submit any documentation or information, required under
this subtitle within sixty (60) days from the date the application was filed.
(b) After sixty (60) days, if an application is incomplete, it shall be considered
abandoned.
(6) (a) After a completed application is filed and an investigation is completed, the
commissioner shall issue an earned wage access services provider license to
the applicant in accordance with this subtitle if the commissioner finds that
the financial responsibility, financial condition, experience, character, and
general fitness of the applicant reasonably demonstrate that the applicant,
each managing principal of the applicant, and each person in control of the
Page 9 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
applicant will operate honestly, fairly, and efficiently in accordance with the
purposes of this subtitle.
(b) If the commissioner finds that the applicant does not meet the requirements
of paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commissioner shall:
1. Not issue a license to the applicant;
2. Return the annual license fee paid by the applicant; and
3. Retain the five hundred dollar ($500) investigation fee to cover the
cost of investigating the application.
(c) When determining whether an applicant has satisfied the qualifications
required under this subsection, the commissioner shall consider the
grounds set forth in Section 11 of this Act.
(d) The commissioner shall approve or deny every application for a license
within sixty (60) days from the receipt of a completed application, unless the
time is extended by a written agreement between the applicant and the
commissioner.
(e) 1. If the commissioner denies a license, the applicant may, within twenty
(20) days from the date of denial, file a written petition requesting a
hearing to appeal with the office of the commissioner.
2. Upon the timely filing of a petition to appeal, an administrative
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
3. If the applicant does not file a petition within the required timeframe,
the applicant shall be deemed to have waived the right to appeal.
(f) The official record of the hearing shall be filed in the office of the
commissioner as a public record, open to public inspection.
(7) Any applicant, or person in control of an applicant, that has a license denied by
the commissioner shall not be eligible to apply for a license, or serve as a person
in control of an applicant or licensee, until the expiration of one (1) year from the
Page 10 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
date a final order denying the license is entered by the commissioner.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Every license shall state:
(a) That the business will be conducted:
1. At one (1) or more physical addresses, which address or addresses
shall be listed;
2. Entirely online; or
3. Both online and at one (1) or more physical addresses, which address
or addresses shall be listed;
(b) The name of the licensee;
(c) Any assumed names used by the licensee; and
(d) The initial date of licensure.
(2) A license shall not be transferable or assignable without the prior written
approval of the commissioner pursuant to Section 9 of this Act.
(3) A licensee may offer and provide earned wage access services online, at one (1)
or more locations, or both, pursuant to a single license issued to the licensee.
(4) Whenever a licensee desires to change a physical place of business to another
location, the licensee shall give written notice to the commissioner at least fifteen
(15) days prior to the location change.
(5) A licensee shall not offer or provide earned wage access services under a name
that is not designated on the license unless the licensee has given written notice to
the commissioner at least thirty (30) days prior to the name change.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "change of control" means any of the following:
(a) A transfer of ownership interest that results in giving a person the power to
Page 11 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
direct the management or policies of a licensee;
(b) For publicly traded licensees, a transfer of at least ten percent (10%) of the
licensee's outstanding voting stock;
(c) For privately held licensees, a transfer of at least fifty percent (50%) of the
licensee's outstanding voting stock; or
(d) If the licensee operates out of one (1) or more physical locations in this
state, the acquisition of an existing licensed location or locations by a
licensee.
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a change of control
shall be approved in writing by the commissioner prior to the change.
(b) A licensee shall file an application with the commissioner within fifteen (15)
days after learning of any change of control that:
1. Results when a person acquires control of a licensee by devise or
descent;
2. Results when a person acquires authority to act:
a. As a personal representative, custodian, guardian, conservator,
or trustee;
b. As an officer appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction; or
c. By operation of law;
3. Results from the public offering of securities; or
4. Has been exempted by administrative regulation or order of the
commissioner, if the commissioner makes a finding that it is in the
public interest to do so.
(3) A licensee shall make an application to the commissioner for approval of a
change of control on a form prescribed by the commissioner.
(4) (a) For changes of control resulting in an existing licensee obtaining control of
another licensee's existing licensed location or locations, the application fee
Page 12 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
shall:
1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, be one
hundred ($100) dollars per location; and
2. Not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) regardless of the number of
locations acquired.
(b) For all other changes of control, the application fee shall be the fees set
forth in Section 6 of this Act.
(5) The commissioner shall approve an application for a change of control if the
commissioner determines that the requirements for obtaining a license will be
satisfied after the change of control.
(6) (a) Before filing an application for approval of a change of control, a licensee
may submit a written request for a determination from the commissioner as
to whether a proposed transaction constitutes a change of control.
(b) If the commissioner determines that a proposed transaction would not
constitute a change of control, then:
1. The commissioner shall respond in writing to that effect; and
2. The licensee shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.
(c) If the commissioner does not make a determination as to whether a
proposed transaction would constitute a change of control within sixty (60)
days from the date of a request, then an application for a change of control
shall not be required.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each license shall remain in full force and effect until it is surrendered by the
licensee, suspended, revoked, or expired as provided in this subtitle.
(2) (a) Each licensee shall, on or before December 31 of each year, pay to the
commissioner the annual license fee set forth in Section 6 of this Act for the
Page 13 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
next succeeding calendar year.
(b) Failure of a licensee to pay the annual license fee shall result in the
expiration of the licensee's license on January 1 of the next succeeding
calendar year.
(3) (a) The commissioner may reinstate an expired license if, within thirty-one (31)
days of expiration, the licensee:
1. Satisfies all requirements set forth in this subtitle; and
2. Pays a one hundred dollar ($100) late fee.
(b) Any reinstatement under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be
retroactive to January 1 of the calendar year in which the license expired.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "adverse action" means the:
(a) Suspension of, revocation of, conditioning or restricting of, or refusal to
issue or renew a license; or
(b) Acceptance of the surrender of a license in lieu of revocation or suspension.
(2) The commissioner may take adverse action against, or issue a cease-or-desist
order to, a licensee, applicant, or person in control of a licensee or applicant if
the commissioner finds, after a thorough investigation, that the person:
(a) Has committed fraud or made a misrepresentation of material fact;
(b) Does not meet, has failed to comply with, or has violated, any provision of:
1. This subtitle; or
2. Any administrative regulation or order of the commissioner issued
under this subtitle;
(c) Has:
1. Made a false statement of material fact in an application for a license;
or
Page 14 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
2. Failed to give a truthful reply to a question in an application;
(d) Has demonstrated incompetence or untrustworthiness to act as a licensee;
(e) Is unfit, through lack of financial responsibility or experience, to conduct
the business of a licensee;
(f) Does not conduct business in accordance with the law or conducts business
by a method that includes activities that are illegal where performed;
(g) Is insolvent;
(h) Is the subject of a permanent or temporary injunction of any court of
competent jurisdiction entered under any other federal or state law
applicable to the financial services industry;
(i) Has:
1. Made, or caused to be made, to the commissioner a false
representation of material fact; or
2. Suppressed or withheld from the commissioner information that the
applicant or licensee possesses and which, if submitted, would have
rendered the applicant or licensee ineligible to be licensed under this
subtitle;
(j) Has:
1. Refused to permit a lawful examination or investigation by the
commissioner; or
2. Refused or failed, within a reasonable time, to furnish to the
commissioner any information or records, or make any report, that
may be required under this subtitle;
(k) Has been convicted of a felony;
(l) Has been convicted of any misdemeanor of which an essential element is:
1. Fraud;
2. Breach of trust; or
Page 15 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
3. Dishonesty;
(m) Has:
1. Had any license, registration, or claim of exemption related to the
financial services industry denied, revoked, suspended, conditioned,
restricted, or probated under the laws of this state; or
2. Surrendered, withdrawn, or terminated any license, registration, or
claim of exemption issued, or registration granted, under the laws of
this state under threat of administrative action;
(n) Has knowingly employed or contracted with a person who has:
1. Failed to obtain any necessary license or registration related to the
financial services industry; or
2. Had a license, registration, or claim of exemption related to the
financial services industry denied, revoked, suspended, conditioned,
restricted, or probated in this state or another jurisdiction;
(o) Has failed to pay any fee required under this subtitle;
(p) Has failed to:
1. Pay state income taxes; or
2. Comply with any administrative or court order directing the payment
of state income tax; or
(q) No longer meets the requirements of this subtitle to hold a license.
(3) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any person, or
person in control of a licensee, who has had a license revoked by the
commissioner shall not be eligible to apply for a license or to serve as a
person in control of a licensee until after expiration of two (2) years from
the date a final order of revocation is entered by the commissioner.
(b) A person whose license has been revoked twice shall:
1. Be deemed permanently revoked; and
Page 16 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
2. Not be eligible for a license or to serve as a person in control of a
licensee.
(4) A person, or person in control of a licensee, against whose license adverse action
has been taken under this section shall not participate in any business in this
state for which a license is required under Section 3 of this Act.
(5) (a) Adverse action taken against a license, or the expiration of a license, shall
not abrogate or modify:
1. The civil or criminal liability of a licensee for acts committed prior to
the surrender or expiration; or
2. The obligation of any preexisting contract between a licensee and a
consumer.
(b) The surrender or expiration of a license shall not affect a proceeding to
suspend or revoke a license.
(6) (a) If the commissioner has reason to believe from evidence satisfactory to the
commissioner that a person has violated, or is about to violate, a provision
of this subtitle, the commissioner may file a complaint in the Franklin
Circuit Court or any court of competent jurisdiction for temporary or
permanent relief against any person.
(b) The court shall have:
1. Jurisdiction over the proceeding; and
2. The power to enter an order or judgment awarding:
a. Preliminary or final injunctive relief; and
b. Any other relief the court deems proper.
(c) Any person who violates a temporary restraining order or injunction issued
by the court, in addition to being held in contempt of court, may be assessed
a civil penalty under Section 25 of this Act by the court.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
Page 17 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The commissioner may enter an emergency order suspending, conditioning,
limiting, or restricting a license without notice or hearing if, after a thorough
investigation and written findings, it appears upon grounds satisfactory to the
commissioner that the licensee has engaged or is engaging in unsafe, unsound,
or illegal practices that pose an imminent threat to the public interest.
(2) The commissioner may enter an emergency cease-and-desist order against an
unlicensed person if, after a thorough investigation, it appears upon grounds
satisfactory to the commissioner that the unlicensed person has engaged or is
engaging in unsafe or unsound practices relating to earned wage access services,
or actions contrary to this subtitle, that pose an imminent threat to the public
interest.
(3) One (1) or more of the following circumstances shall be considered sufficient
grounds for an emergency order under this section if it appears on grounds
satisfactory to the commissioner that:
(a) The licensee has willfully failed to comply with one (1) or more of the
requirements of this subtitle;
(b) The licensee is in such financial condition that it cannot continue in the
business with safety to its consumers;
(c) The licensee, or a person in control of the licensee:
1. Has been found guilty of any act involving fraud, deception, theft, or
breach of trust; or
2. Is the subject of:
a. An active administrative cease-and-desist order or similar order
in this state; or
b. A permanent or temporary injunction currently in effect entered
by any court or agency of competent jurisdiction;
Page 18 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
(d) The licensee has:
1. Made a misrepresentation of material fact to, or concealed an
essential or material fact from, a person in the course of doing
business; or
2. Engaged in a course of business that has worked or tended to work a
fraud or deceit upon a person or would so operate;
(e) The licensee has refused to permit a lawful examination or investigation, or
has refused or failed, within a reasonable time, to furnish any information
or make any report that may have been requested by commissioner in
connection with a lawful investigation or examination; or
(f) The licensee has:
1. Had any license, registration, or claim of exemption related to the
financial services industry denied, suspended, or revoked under the
laws of this state; or
2. Surrendered or terminated any license, registration, or claim of
exemption issued under the laws of this state under threat of
administrative action.
(4) (a) An emergency order issued under this section, compliant with KRS
13B.125, becomes effective when served by the commissioner.
(b) The emergency order shall be delivered by personal service or certified mail
to the last known address of every affected party.
(5) (a) A person aggrieved by an emergency order issued by the commissioner
under this section may request an emergency hearing.
(b) The request for hearing shall be filed with the commissioner within twenty
(20) days of service of the emergency order.
(6) Upon receipt of a timely written request for an emergency hearing, an emergency
hearing shall be conducted as set forth in KRS 13B.125.
Page 19 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
(7) An emergency order issued under this section shall remain in effect until it is:
(a) Stayed, withdrawn, or superseded by an order of the commissioner; or
(b) Terminated by a court order.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Notice of entry of any order denying a license shall be in writing and served
personally or sent by certified mail to the last known address of the
applicant.
(b) A person whose application has been denied may, within twenty (20) days of
service of the notice, submit a written petition to the commissioner
requesting a hearing. The hearing shall be held in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B.
(c) If no written petition is received, the commissioner may enter a final order
denying the license.
(2) (a) The commissioner may file an administrative complaint against any person
or licensee that the commissioner believes has or may have violated this
subtitle and the violation of which is subject to the penalties set forth in
Section 11 or 25 of this Act.
(b) 1. The commissioner shall serve an administrative complaint against a
person or licensee personally or by certified mail, return receipt
requested, postage prepaid, to the last known address of each person
or licensee named in the complaint.
2. a. The person or licensee named in the complaint shall be entitled
to a hearing on the complaint, held in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B.
b. A written request for a hearing shall be submitted to the
department, along with a written answer to the complaint, within
Page 20 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
twenty (20) days of being served the complaint.
3. If a written answer and request for a hearing are not filed within
twenty (20) days of being served the complaint:
a. The person or licensee shall be deemed to have waived the
hearing; and
b. The commissioner may enter a final order granting the relief
requested in the complaint.
(3) Whenever the commissioner denies any application for a license or assesses any
of the penalties set forth in Section 11 or 25 of this Act, the commissioner shall
file in his or her office a written order to that effect, stating:
(a) The commissioner's findings with respect to the order; and
(b) The reasons for the action.
(4) Any final order shall be served in the same manner as an administrative
complaint under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Service by certified mail under this subtitle shall be deemed complete as provided
in KRS 13B.050(2).
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Unless a remedy is otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle, any licensee or
person aggrieved by a final decision of the commissioner issued pursuant to this
subtitle may, within twenty (20) days of service of notice of the decision, request an
administrative hearing which shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter
13B.
SECTION 15. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "fee":
(a) Means:
Page 21 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
1. A fee imposed by an earned wage access services provider for delivery
or expedited delivery of proceeds to a consumer; or
2. A subscription or membership fee imposed by an earned wage access
services provider for a bona fide group of services that include earned
wage access services; and
(b) Does not include a tip, gratuity, or other donation.
(2) An earned wage access services provider shall:
(a) Develop and implement policies and procedures to:
1. Respond to questions raised by consumers; and
2. Address complaints from consumers in an expedient manner;
(b) If the provider offers a consumer the option to receive proceeds for a fee or
solicits a tip, gratuity, or other donation:
1. Offer the consumer at least one (1) reasonable option to obtain
proceeds at no cost to the consumer; and
2. Clearly explain how to elect the no-cost option;
(c) If the provider solicits, charges, or receives a tip, gratuity , or other donation
from a consumer:
1. Clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer immediately prior
to each transaction that a tip, gratuity, or other donation amount:
a. May be zero dollars ($0); and
b. Is voluntary; and
2. Clearly and conspicuously disclose in its service contract with the
consumer and elsewhere that:
a. Tips, gratuities, and other donations are voluntary; and
b. The offering of earned wage access services, including the
amount of proceeds the consumer is eligible to request and the
frequency with which proceeds are provided to the consumer, are
Page 22 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
not contingent on:
i. Whether the consumer pays a tip, gratuity, or other
donation; or
ii. The size of a tip, gratuity, or other donation;
(d) Before entering into an agreement with a consumer for earned wage access
services:
1. Inform the consumer of his or her rights under the agreement; and
2. Fully and clearly disclose all fees associated with the earned wage
access services;
(e) Inform the consumer of any material changes to the terms and conditions
of an agreement for earned wage access services before implementing those
changes for that consumer;
(f) Provide proceeds to a consumer by any means mutually agreed upon by the
consumer and the provider;
(g) Allow the consumer to cancel use of the provider's earned wage access
services at any time without incurring a cancellation fee imposed by the
provider;
(h) Comply with all applicable local, state, and federal privacy laws and
information security laws; and
(i) If the provider will seek repayment of outstanding proceeds or payment of
fees or other amounts owed, including tips, gratuities, or other donations, in
connection with the activities covered by this subtitle from a consumer's
account at a depository institution, including by means of electronic fund
transfer:
1. Comply with applicable provisions of the Electronic Fund Transfer
Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693 to 1693r, as amended, and any administrative
regulations promulgated thereunder, as amended; and
Page 23 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
2. a. Except as provided in subdivision b. of this subparagraph,
reimburse the consumer for the full amount of any overdraft or
nonsufficient fund fees imposed on the consumer by the
consumer's depository institution that were caused by the
provider attempting to seek payment of any outstanding
proceeds, fees, or other payments, including tips, gratuities, or
other donations, in connection with the activities covered by this
subtitle, on a date before, or in an incorrect amount from, the
date or amount disclosed to the consumer.
b. A provider shall not be subject to subdivision a. of this
subparagraph for payments of outstanding proceeds or fees
incurred by a consumer through fraudulent or other unlawful
means.
SECTION 16. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
For purposes of this subtitle, an earned wage access services provider may use the
mailing address or state of residence provided to the provider by a consumer or the
consumer's employer to determine the consumer's state of residence.
SECTION 17. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Fee" has the same meaning as in Section 15 of this Act; and
(b) "Nationwide consumer reporting agency" means a consumer reporting
agency that compiles and maintain files on consumers on a nationwide
basis as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681a(p).
(2) An earned wage access services provider shall not:
(a) Share with an employer a portion of any fees or any tips, gratuities, or other
Page 24 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
donations received from or charged to a consumer for earned wage access
services;
(b) Require a consumer's credit report or credit score provided or issued by a
nationwide consumer reporting agency to determine a consumer's eligibility
for earned wage access services;
(c) Accept payment of outstanding proceeds, fees, or tips, gratuities, or other
donations from a consumer by means of a credit card or charge card;
(d) Charge a consumer a late fee, deferral fee, interest, or any other penalty or
charge for failure to pay:
1. Outstanding proceeds;
2. Fees; or
3. Tips, gratuities, or other donations;
(e) Report to a nationwide consumer reporting agency or debt collector
information about a consumer regarding the inability of the provider to be
repaid:
1. Outstanding proceeds;
2. Fees; or
3. Tips, gratuities, or other donations;
(f) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, compel or
attempt to compel payment by a consumer of outstanding proceeds,
fees, or tips, gratuities, or other donations to the provider through any
of the following means:
a. A suit against the consumer in a court of competent jurisdiction;
b. Use of a third party to pursue collection from the consumer on
the provider's behalf; or
c. Sale of the outstanding proceeds, fees, or tips, gratuities, or other
donations to a third-party debt collector or debt buyer for
Page 25 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
collection from a consumer.
2. The prohibitions in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall not:
a. Apply to payments of outstanding proceeds or fees incurred by a
consumer through fraudulent or other unlawful means; or
b. Preclude a provider from pursuing an employer for breach of its
contractual obligations to the provider;
(g) If the provider solicits, charges, or receives tips, gratuities, or other
donations from a consumer:
1. Mislead or deceive a consumer about the voluntary nature of the tips,
gratuities, or other donations; or
2. Represent that tips, gratuities, or other donations will benefit any
specific individual or group of individuals; or
(h) Advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, broadcast, or televise, or permit
to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, broadcasted, or
televised, any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation
regarding the terms or conditions of the provider's earned wage access
services.
SECTION 18. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Every licensee shall maintain an agent in this state for service of process.
(2) The name, physical address, telephone number, and email address of the agent in
this state for service of process shall be filed with an application for a license.
(3) The commissioner shall be notified in writing by the licensee at least five (5) days
prior to any change in the status of an agent in this state for service of process.
SECTION 19. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) On or before January 30 of each year, each licensee shall file with the
Page 26 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
commissioner a report, which shall:
(a) Be made:
1. Under oath; and
2. In a form prescribed by the commissioner; and
(b) Include the following information regarding the earned wage access
services provided by the licensee in this state for the preceding calendar
year:
1. The gross revenue attributable to the licensee's earned wage access
services;
2. The total number of:
a. Transactions in which the licensee provided proceeds to
consumers; and
b. Unique consumers to whom the licensee provided proceeds;
3. The total dollar amount of:
a. Proceeds the licensee provided to consumers; and
b. The following that the licensee received from consumers:
i. Fees; and
ii. Tips, gratuities, and other donations; and
4. Any other relevant information as the commissioner may reasonably
require.
(2) The commissioner shall annually make and publish an analysis and
recapitulation of the reports submitted under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 20. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) To enable the commissioner to determine whether a licensee is complying
with this subtitle and with the administrative regulations promulgated under
this subtitle, each licensee shall keep and use in the licensee's business
Page 27 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
books, accounts, and records in accordance with sound accounting
principles and practices.
(b) Unless applicable state or federal law requires a longer retention period,
each licensee shall, after making a final entry in its earned wage access
services-related books, accounts, or records, preserve the books, accounts,
or records for at least two (2) years.
(2) (a) Any licensee that intends to cease operation of any business or location
licensed under this subtitle shall:
1. Give the commissioner at least thirty (30) days prior written notice of
the cessation of operations and a plan for ceasing operations that is
sufficient to safeguard the interest of the public; and
2. Designate a custodian of records prior to cessation of operations, who
shall:
a. Agree in writing to:
i. Serve in that capacity; and
ii. Comply with the requirements of this section; and
b. Notify the commissioner of:
i. The designation, including but not limited to the
custodian's name, physical address, email address, and
telephone number; and
ii. The physical location inside or outside of this state where
the records required to be kept under this subtitle will be
preserved.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to changes of location authorized under
Section 8 of this Act.
(3) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, all records
referenced in this section shall be made accessible to the commissioner or
Page 28 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
the commissioner's designated representative upon demand.
(b) Records held by a designated custodian under subsection (2) of this section
shall be made accessible upon five (5) business days' written notice.
(4) If good cause is demonstrated, the commissioner may approve a written request
for the destruction of records required to be preserved under this subtitle prior to
the minimum retention period required under this section.
(5) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly withhold, abstract, alter, remove,
mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, or other information required to
be preserved under this subtitle for the purpose of obstructing a subpoena issued
by, or an investigation or examination conducted by, the commissioner.
SECTION 21. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The following shall be considered confidential by law and privileged, and shall
not be subject to disclosure under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to
61.884:
(a) Reports of examination, and correspondence that relates to a report of
examination, of a licensee;
(b) Investigations, and records that relate to an investigation, conducted under
this subtitle;
(c) Annual reports filed under Section 19 of this Act; and
(d) Any confidential and privileged documents, materials, reports, or
information received by the commissioner under subsection (5)(c) of this
section.
(2) Confidential and privileged documents shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall
not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any civil action, unless the
commissioner determines, or after notice to the commissioner and a hearing, a
court of competent jurisdiction determines, that the commissioner would not be
Page 29 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
prejudiced.
(3) (a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, all other documents, materials,
reports, or other information that are provided to or filed with the
commissioner under this subtitle shall be open to public inspection.
(b) The commissioner may, as authorized by KRS Chapter 61, classify as
confidential or withhold from public inspection for a period of time as the
commissioner considers necessary, any information which, in the
commissioner's judgment, the public welfare or the welfare of any licensee
or its consumers requires to be withheld.
(4) The commissioner or any person who receives documents, materials, reports, or
other information while acting under the authority of the commissioner shall not
be required to testify in any civil action concerning any confidential documents,
materials, reports, or information.
(5) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner's duties, the
commissioner may:
(a) Use, disclose, or make public the confidential and privileged documents or
information referenced in subsection (1) of this section in furtherance of
any regulatory or legal action brought as part of the commissioner's official
duties;
(b) Share the confidential and privileged documents referenced in subsection
(1) of this section with other state or federal regulatory agencies, or with
local, state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, if the
recipient agrees to maintain the confidential and privileged status of the
documents in accordance with any sharing or use agreements referenced in
paragraph (d) of this subsection;
(c) Receive documents, materials, reports, or other information, including
otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, reports, or
Page 30 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
information, from other state, federal, and international regulatory
agencies, the related associations, affiliates, or subsidiaries, and from local,
state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, except the
commissioner shall maintain as confidential and privileged any documents,
materials, reports, or information received with notice or the understanding
that they are confidential and privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction
that is the source of the documents, materials, reports, or information; and
(d) Enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of confidential
documents and information when the sharing or use is serving a legitimate
governmental need or is necessary in the performance of a legitimate
governmental function, including the furtherance of any regulatory or legal
action brought as part of the recipient's official duties.
(6) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in documents,
materials, report, or information shall occur as a result of the disclosures
authorized under this section.
SECTION 22. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The provisions of this subtitle shall be enforced by the commissioner, who may
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for
the proper conduct of the business regulated under this subtitle.
(2) (a) 1. The commissioner may examine the affairs, business, office, and
earned wage access services-related records of every licensee as the
commissioner deems necessary to:
a. Discover violations of this subtitle; or
b. Secure information necessary for the proper enforcement of this
subtitle.
2. Every licensee shall pay a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the cost of
Page 31 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
each examination based upon fair compensation for time and actual
expenses.
(b) The commissioner may conduct investigations of licensees or persons within
or outside this state.
(c) For the purpose of making examinations or investigations under this
subsection, the commissioner and the commissioner's representatives:
1. May:
a. Compel the attendance of any person or obtain any documents
by subpoenas;
b. Administer oaths and affirmations; and
c. Examine under oath or affirmation all persons whose testimony
the commissioner may require, relative to the business of the
licensee; and
2. Shall have free access to the accounts, papers, records, files, safes,
vaults, offices, and places of business used in connection with any
business conducted under a license.
(3) (a) The commissioner may investigate any person who is or appears to be
engaging in the business regulated by this subtitle without first obtaining a
license.
(b) For the purpose of investigations of unlicensed persons, the commissioner
or the commissioner's representatives may:
1. Compel the attendance of any person or obtain any documents by
subpoenas;
2. Administer oaths and affirmations; and
3. Examine under oath or affirmation all persons whose testimony the
commissioner may require, relative to the business of the person.
(4) If any person fails to comply with a subpoena issued by the commissioner under
Page 32 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
this section, the commissioner may petition the Franklin Circuit Court or any
court of competent jurisdiction for enforcement of the subpoena.
(5) In order to carry out the purposes of this subtitle, the commissioner may:
(a) Retain examiners, auditors, investigators, attorneys, accountants, or other
professionals and specialists to conduct or assist in the conduct of any:
1. Examination;
2. Investigation; or
3. Enforcement action; and
(b) Use, hire, contract, or employ public or private analytical systems, methods,
or software.
(6) The authority of this section shall remain in effect regardless of whether a person
acts or claims to act under any licensing law of this subtitle.
SECTION 23. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(a) Earned wage access services offered and provided by a licensee shall not be
considered any of the following:
1. In violation of, or noncompliant with, any law governing:
a. Deductions from payroll, salary, wages, compensation, or other
income; or
b. The purchase, sale, or assignment of, or an order for, earned but
unpaid income;
2. A loan or other form of credit or debt; or
3. Money transmission; and
(b) With respect to earned wage access services, a licensee shall not be
considered:
1. A creditor, debt collector, or lender; or
Page 33 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
2. A money transmitter; and
(c) Fees or tips, gratuities, or other donations paid in accordance with this
subtitle to a licensee shall not be considered interest or finance charges.
(2) If there is a conflict between a provision of this subtitle and any other provision
of law, the provision of this subtitle shall prevail.
SECTION 24. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A licensee shall not be subject to any liability for any act or omission made in
conformity with a written notice, opinion, or interpretation issued by the commissioner.
SECTION 25. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) For any repetitive violation of this subtitle or an administrative regulation
promulgated under this subtitle, or any willful violation of an order of the
commissioner entered under this subtitle, the commissioner may levy a civil
penalty against any licensee.
(b) The civil penalty shall not be less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or
more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation, plus
the state's costs and expenses for the examination and prosecution of the
matter, including reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
(2) (a) For an occurrence of consumer harm by any licensee resulting from any
violation of this subtitle, an administrative regulation promulgated under
this subtitle, or an order of the commissioner entered under this subtitle, the
commissioner may:
1. Order any remedy authorized in subsection (4) of this section; and
2. Levy a civil penalty against the licensee if the total amount of
consumer harm exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(b) The civil penalty shall be:
Page 34 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
1. The lesser of:
a. One thousand dollars ($1,000) per consumer harmed; or
b. Ten percent (10%) of the total cumulative amount of ordered
rescission, restitution, refund, disgorgement, or the recovery of
expenses; and
2. The state's costs and expenses for the examination and prosecution of
the matter, including reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
(3) (a) The commissioner shall levy a civil penalty against any unlicensed person
who violates any provision of this subtitle, administrative regulation
promulgated under this subtitle, or order of the commissioner entered under
this subtitle.
(b) The civil penalty shall not be less than two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) or more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per
violation, plus the state's costs and expenses for the examination,
investigation, and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable
attorney's fees and court costs.
(4) The commissioner:
(a) May order rescission, restitution, refund, disgorgement, recovery of
expenses, and direct such other affirmative action as the commissioner
deems necessary against any licensee or person who violates any order
issued by the commissioner or any provision of, or administrative regulation
promulgated under, this subtitle; and
(b) Shall have jurisdiction to institute an action in Franklin Circuit Court or
any court of competent jurisdiction for the enforcement of orders issued
under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) The commissioner may notify the Department of Revenue, which may institute an
action in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky in Franklin Circuit Court
Page 35 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
or any court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of any civil penalty, fine,
cost, or fee assessed or levied under this subtitle.
SECTION 26. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any person that violates Section 3 of this Act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five
hundred dollars ($500) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(2) (a) Any person who willfully violates any administrative regulation or order of
the commissioner authorized under this subtitle shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(b) A person that violates an order of the commissioner shall not be imprisoned
for the violation unless the person had actual knowledge of the order.
(3) Any contract made in violation of this subtitle shall be void and the earned wage
access services provider shall not have the right to collect any outstanding
proceeds, fees, or tips, gratuities, or other donations in connection with the
earned wage access services described in the contract.
(4) Nothing in this section limits the power of the commissioner to revoke any license
in accordance with Section 11 of this Act.
Section 27. KRS 286.4-410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this subtitle, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Applicant" means a person filing an application under this subtitle;
(b) "Consumer loan company" means a person licensed under this subtitle to
engage in the business of making loans to a consumer for personal, family, or
household use in the amount or value of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or
less;
(c) "Control" means the power to direct the management or policies of a licensee
or applicant, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, or
Page 36 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
otherwise;
(d) "Executive officer" means a natural person holding the title or responsibility
of president, vice president, chief executive officer, chief financial officer,
chief operational officer, or chief compliance officer;
(e) "Licensee" means a person licensed under this subtitle;
(f) "Managing principal" means a natural person who meets the requirements of
KRS 286.4-450 and actively participates in and is primarily responsible for
the operations of a licensee;
(g) "Material fact" means a fact that a reasonable person knows, or should know,
that could reasonably be expected to influence any decision or action taken by
the commissioner under this subtitle;
(h) "Nationwide consumer reporting agency" means a consumer reporting agency
that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis as
defined by Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. sec.
1681a(p); and
(i) "Person in control of a licensee or applicant" means, with respect to an
applicant or licensee, any of the following:
1. A director, general partner, or executive officer;
2. In the case of a limited liability company, a managing member or
manager;
3. Any person who directly or indirectly has the right to vote twenty-five
percent (25%) or more of a class of voting securities;
4. Any person who has the power to sell or direct the sale of twenty-five
percent (25%) or more of a class of voting securities;
5. In the case of a partnership or limited liability company, any person that
has the right to receive twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the capital
upon dissolution; or
Page 37 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
6. Any person that exercises control.
(2) This subtitle shall not apply to:
(a) Any person doing business under and as permitted by any law of this state or
of the United States relating to banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings
and loan associations, agricultural cooperative associations, credit unions, or
licensed pawnbrokers;[. This subtitle does not apply to ]
(b) The purchase or acquisition, directly or indirectly, of notes, chattel mortgages,
installment or conditional sales contracts, embodying liens or evidencing title
retention arising from the bona fide sale of goods or services by a seller of the
goods or services; and
(c) Any person doing business under and as permitted by Subtitle 13 of this
chapter.
Section 28. KRS 286.11-007 is amended to read as follows:
This subtitle does not apply to:
(1) The United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof;
(2) The United States Post Office or a contractor acting on behalf of the United States
Post Office;
(3) A state or any agency, department, or political subdivision of a state;
(4) A financial institution or its subsidiaries, affiliates, and service corporations, or any
office of an international banking corporation, branch of a foreign bank, or
corporation organized pursuant to the Bank Service Corporation Act, 12 U.S.C.
secs. 181 to 1867, or a corporation organized under the Edge Act, 12 U.S.C. secs.
611 to 633;
(5) A service provider that:
(a) Pursuant to a written agreement, acts on behalf of an entity exempt from
licensure as set forth in subsection (4) of this section; and
(b) Allows the state or federal regulators with regulatory jurisdiction over the
Page 38 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
exempt entity to examine and inspect the service provider's applicable
records, books, and transactions;
(6) A service provider that receives money or monetary value on behalf of an entity
selling goods or services other than money transmission services if:
(a) The entity, upon receipt of funds by the service provider, immediately either:
1. Provides the purchased goods or services to the purchaser; or
2. Credits the purchaser for the full amount of money or monetary value
received by the service provider, which credit is not revocable by the
entity, and evidences this credit in writing; and
(b) The entity is obligated to provide the purchased goods or services to the
purchaser regardless of whether or not the service provider transmits the
money or monetary value to the entity;[ or]
(7) Any person doing business under and as permitted by Subtitle 13 of this chapter;
or
(8) The provision of electronic transfer of government benefits for any federal, state, or
county governmental agency as defined in Federal Reserve Board Regulation E, by
a contractor for and on behalf of the United States or any department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof, or any state or any political subdivisions thereof.
Section 29. KRS 371.150 is amended to read as follows:
KRS 371.110 to 371.150 do not apply to any:
(1) National or state bank;[, or to any ]
(2) Credit union;[ or ]
(3) Trust company; or
(4) Person doing business under and as permitted by Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 286.
Section 30. Sections 1 to 26 of this Act may be cited as the Kentucky Earned
Wage Access Services Act.
Section 31. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
Page 39 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1770
other than a natural person that was acting as an earned wage access services provider in
this state on January 1, 2025, may continue to act as a provider on and after the effective
date of this Act without obtaining the license required under Section 3 of this Act if the
person:
(a) Complies with all other requirements of Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 286; and
(b) Submits an application for a license under Section 3 of this Act within six (6)
months of the date that the commissioner of the Department of Financial Institutions
makes the application available.
(2) The authority to act as an earned wage access services provider under
subsection (1) of this section shall expire when the commissioner of the Department of
Financial Institutions approves or denies an application made by the person in accordance
with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
Page 40 of 40
XXXX 2/13/2025 11:00 AM Jacketed